Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the purpose of medical school is to teach the best candidates to be the best doctors that they can become. In order to do so, candidates should be placed into an environment where they are provided feedback on their coursework in an objective manner, compared to their classmates. A grading system encourages preparedness in the pupil as well as positive performance and rising outcomes. Better grades will lead to better doctors. As a result, it is the intent of the legislature to require medical schools issue letter grades or a tiered system with at least four designations for each course offered.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:The school of medicine at the University of Washington, established under chapter 28B.20 RCW, and the school of medicine at Washington State University, established under chapter 28B.30 RCW, shall ensure that any coursework offered in the curriculum for a medical degree or certificate assesses a student's performance on the coursework based on the assignment of a letter grade from A to F or a tiered system with at least four designations.--- END ---